Missouri, session 2026, SB1189.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 211.331 and 211.341, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 211.331, 211.341, and 211.342, to read as
follows:
211.331. 1. In each county of the first and second
classifications, except as provided by section 211.331, and
in the city of St. Louis, it is the duty of the county
commission, or, where there is no county commission, such
other authorized body, to provide a place of detention for
children coming within the provisions of this chapter. It
is also the duty of the county commission or other
authorized body to provide offices for the personnel of the
juvenile court.
2. The place of detention shall be so located and
arranged that the child being detained does not come in
contact, at any time or in any manner, with adults convicted
or under arrest, and the care of children in detention shall
approximate as closely as possible the care of children in
good homes.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1189 2
3. The place of detention shall be in charge of a
superintendent. The judge of the juvenile court or the
family court administrator, if provided by local rule, shall
appoint and fix the compensation and maintenance of the
superintendent and of any assistants or other personnel
required to operate the detention facility. Such
compensation and maintenance are payable out of funds of the
county.
4. The county commission or other governing body of
the county is authorized to lease or to acquire by purchase,
gift or devise land for such purpose, and to erect buildings
thereon and to provide funds to equip and maintain the same
for the subsistence and education of the children placed
therein.
211.341. 1. Counties of the third and fourth classes
within one judicial circuit, shall, upon the written
recommendation of or written notice by the county
commission, or, where there is no county commission, such
other authorized body, to the presiding circuit judge of
that judicial circuit, establish a place of juvenile
detention to serve all of the counties within that judicial
circuit, and in like manner, the counties shall supply
offices for the juvenile officers of that circuit.
2. (1) The recommendation of the presiding circuit
judge provided in subsection 1 of this section shall be made
only after a hearing conducted by [him] the judge, after
thirty days' notice, to determine the need and feasibility
of establishing such a place of detention within the
judicial circuit.
(2) The notice to the presiding circuit judge of the
judicial circuit provided in subsection 1 of this section
shall consist of notice of approval of an ordinance, order,

SB 1189 3
or resolution authorizing a place of detention by all
counties within that judicial circuit and the agreement
provided in section 211.342.
3. The provisions of section 211.331 apply as to the
form of operation and means of maintenance of the place of
detention, except that the total cost of establishment and
operation of the places of detention shall be prorated among
the several counties within that judicial circuit upon a
ratio to be determined by a comparison of the respective
populations of the counties. The point of location of the
place of juvenile detention shall be determined by the
circuit judge of the judicial circuit or pursuant to an
agreement established by section 211.342.
[2.] 4. The presiding circuit judges of any two or
more adjoining judicial circuits after a hearing as provided
in subsection 1 of this section may, by agreement confirmed
by judicial order, and in the interest of economy of
administration, establish one place of juvenile detention to
serve their respective judicial circuits. In such event,
the presiding circuit judges so agreeing shall jointly
govern the affairs of the place of detention and the cost
thereof shall be apportioned among the counties served in
the manner provided for in subsection 1 of this section.
[3.] 5. Any county of the third or fourth class
desiring to provide its own place of juvenile detention may
do so in the manner prescribed for counties of the first and
second classes.
211.342. 1. (1) A county commission, or any other
authorized body, may provide a place of detention for
children coming within the provisions of this chapter in
coordination with the county commission, or such other

SB 1189 4
authorized body, of the other counties within the same
circuit court.
(2) The county commission, or authorized body, of each
county desiring to coordinate a place of detention under
this subsection shall approve an ordinance, order, or
resolution authorizing a place of detention within the
county or within a county of the same circuit court and
shall approve an agreement as specified by subsection 4 of
this section between all counties of the same circuit court.
2. The county commissions, or any other authorized
bodies, of any two or more counties of adjoining judicial
circuits may, by ordinance, order, or resolution authorizing
a place of detention within one of the counties and
following an agreement as specified by subsection 4 of this
section between all counties of the adjoining circuit
courts, establish one place of juvenile detention to serve
the respective judicial circuits of the counties. All
counties within a respective judicial circuit are required
to authorize the place of detention and be members to the
agreement in order for a place of detention to be authorized
pursuant to this subsection.
3. The county commissions, or authorized bodies, shall
notify the presiding circuit judge of the judicial circuit
of the authorization of a place of detention under this
subsection. The notice to the presiding circuit judges of
the judicial circuits shall include notice of the approval
of an ordinance, order, or resolution authorizing a place of
detention by all counties and the agreement provided in
subsection 4 of this section.
4. The agreement that specifies the duties of each
county shall contain the following:

SB 1189 5
(1) The total cost of establishment and operation of
the places of detention;
(2) The prorated formula for the calculation of each
county's contribution to the costs of a detention facility
based upon a ratio of the respective populations of the
counties;
(3) The methods and powers that may be used for
constructing, leasing, or financing a detention facility;
(4) The use of the sales tax as authorized by
subsection 6 of this section; and
(5) The point of location of the place of juvenile
detention.
5. Subsection 2 and 3 of section 211.331 shall apply
to a juvenile detention facility authorized pursuant to this
section. The operation and support of a juvenile detention
facility authorized pursuant to this section shall be
regulated in accordance with the rules and standards of the
Missouri supreme court under the governance of the circuit
judge of the circuit court. If two or more counties of
adjoining judicial circuits have authorized a place of
detention pursuant to this section, the circuit judges shall
jointly govern the affairs of the place of detention.
6. (1) The counties authorizing a place of detention
pursuant to this section may impose, by order, a sales tax
up to one percent on all retail sales made in such counties
which are subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of
sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of providing a
place of detention for children coming within the provisions
of this chapter in the respective counties. The tax
authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and
all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no order
imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section shall be

SB 1189 6
effective unless the county commission, or authorized body,
for each county in the circuit court submits to the voters
of the county, on any election date authorized in chapter
115, a proposal to authorize the county commission, or
authorized body, to impose a tax.
(2) The ballot of submission shall contain, but need
not be limited to, the following language:
Shall the (counties' names) impose a region-wide
sales tax of ______ (insert amount) for the
purpose of providing a place of detention for
children within in the jurisdiction of (circuit
courts' name)?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters of the county voting thereon are in favor
of the proposal, then the order and any amendment to such
order shall be in effect on the first day of the second
quarter immediately following the election approving the
proposal. If the proposal receives less than the required
majority, the county commission, or authorized body, shall
have no power to impose the sales tax authorized pursuant to
this section unless and until the county commission, or
authorized body, shall again have submitted another proposal
to authorize the county commission, or authorized body, to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such
proposal is approved by the required majority of the

SB 1189 7
qualified voters of the county commission, or authorized
body, voting on such proposal; however, in no event shall a
100 proposal pursuant to this section be submitted to the voters
101 sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
102 submission of a proposal pursuant to this section.
103 (3) All revenue received by a county from the tax
104 authorized pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a
105 special trust fund and shall be used solely for providing a
106 place of detention for children coming within the provisions
107 of this chapter for so long as the tax shall remain in
108 effect.
109 (4) Once the tax authorized by this section is
110 abolished or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in
111 the special trust fund shall be used solely for providing a
112 place of detention for children coming within the provisions
113 of this chapter for the counties. Any funds in such special
114 trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may
115 be invested by the county commission in accordance with
116 applicable laws relating to the investment of other county
117 funds.
118 (5) All sales taxes collected by the director of
119 revenue pursuant to this section on behalf of any county,
120 less one percent for cost of collection which shall be
121 deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment
122 of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087,
123 shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby
124 created, to be known as the "Juvenile Detention Center Sales
125 Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the juvenile detention
126 center sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state
127 funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the
128 state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records
129 of the amount of money in the trust fund which was collected

SB 1189 8
130 in each county imposing a sales tax pursuant to this
131 section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of
132 officers of each member county and the public. Not later
133 than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue
134 shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund
135 during the preceding month to the county which levied the
136 tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the treasurer of
137 each such county, and all expenditures of funds arising from
138 the juvenile detention center sales tax trust fund shall be
139 paid pursuant to an appropriation adopted by the county
140 commission, or other such authorized body, and shall be
141 approved by the county commission, or other such authorized
142 body. Expenditures may be made from the fund for the
143 function authorized in the order adopted by the county
144 commission, or other such authorized body, submitting the
145 juvenile detention center tax to the voters.
146 (6) The director of revenue may make refunds from the
147 amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for
148 erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
149 dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such
150 counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county
151 commission, or the authorizing body, shall notify the
152 director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior
153 to the effective date of the repeal, and the director of
154 revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
155 of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after
156 receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
157 overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and
158 drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one
159 year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of
160 the tax in such county, the director of revenue shall remit
161 the balance in the account to the county and close the

SB 1189 9
162 account of that county. The director of revenue shall
163 notify each county in each instance of any amount refunded
164 or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
165 (7) Except as provided in this section, all provisions
166 of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed
167 pursuant to this section.
✓